Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202685-1920
Nebraska Opportunity Grant Fund; created; use; investment.

The Nebraska Opportunity Grant Fund is created. Money in the fund shall include amounts transferred pursuant to section 79-3501 from the State Lottery Operation Trust Fund and amounts transferred from the Davis Scholarship Trust Fund. All amounts accruing to the Nebraska Opportunity Grant Fund shall be used to carry out the Nebraska Opportunity Grant Act. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2003, LB 574, § 20;

Laws 2010, LB956, § 18;

Laws 2013, LB497, § 6;

Laws 2015, LB519, § 38;

Laws 2021, LB528, § 56;

Laws 2023, LB705, § 120;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 227.
April 8, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.